Utah statutes.
77-7-7.   Force in making arrest.
If a person is being arrested and flees or forcibly resists after being
informed of the intention to make the arrest, the person arresting may use
reasonable force to effect the arrest. Deadly force may be used only as
provided in Section 76-2-404.
